Tennessee, session 114, SB0412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-6-103, is amended by adding the
following as new subsection:
(d) County election commissions shall set uniform hours for each polling place
used for early voting such that each polling place opens and closes at the same time on
a single day. Open hours may vary by day so long as all polling places open on a
particular day have uniform hours.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0412
002159
- 1 -